Maine, session 132, LD206.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §4016, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. G, §1, is
amended to read:
2. Minimum hourly wage. Except as provided in subsection 3, for For the school
year starting after June 30, 2025 and for each subsequent school year, the minimum hourly
wage for educational technicians is equal to 125% of the minimum hourly wage established
in Title 26, section 664, subsection 1 and the minimum hourly wage for other school
support staff is equal to 115% of the minimum hourly wage established in Title 26, section
664, subsection 1.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §4016, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. G, §1, is
repealed.
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §15677, sub-§2, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. G,
§3, is amended to read:
C. For fiscal year 2025-26 and for each subsequent fiscal year, the commissioner shall
update the previous year's salary matrix to reflect appropriate trends in the Consumer
Price Index or other comparable index and to reflect any increase in the minimum
hourly wage of educational technicians and other school support staff in accordance
with section 4016, subsection 3.
Sec. 4. 26 MRSA §664, sub-§1, as amended by IB 2015, c. 2, §1, is further
amended to read:
1. Minimum wage. The minimum hourly wage is $7.50 $14.65 per hour. Starting
January 1, 2017, the minimum hourly wage is $9.00 per hour; starting January 1, 2018, the
minimum hourly wage is $10.00 per hour; starting January 1, 2019, the minimum hourly
wage is $11.00 per hour; and starting January 1, 2020, the minimum hourly wage is $12.00
per hour. On January 1, 2021 and each January 1st thereafter, the minimum hourly wage
then in effect must be increased by the increase, if any, in the cost of living. The increase
in the cost of living must be measured by the percentage increase, if any, as of August of
the previous year over the level as of August of the year preceding that year in the
Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers, CPI-W, for the
Northeast Region, or its successor index, as published by the United States Department of
Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics or its successor agency, with the amount of the minimum
wage increase rounded to the nearest multiple of 5¢. If the highest federal minimum wage
is increased in excess of the minimum wage in effect under this section, the minimum wage
under this section is increased to the same amount, effective on the same date as the
increase in the federal minimum wage, and must be increased in accordance with this
section thereafter.
Sec. 5. 36 MRSA §5217-E, sub-§1, ¶E, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 635, Pt. H, §15,
is amended by amending subparagraph (3) to read:
(3) During the taxable year had earned income of at least the state minimum wage,
as set out in Title 26, section 664, subsection 1, as adjusted for cost-of-living
increases, as determined on January 1st of the taxable year, multiplied by 936
hours. The assessor may adopt rules reducing this amount if a portion of the
taxable year falls within a disaster period. Rules adopted pursuant to this
Page 1 - 132LR0436(01)

414 subparagraph are routine technical rules pursuant to Title 5, chapter 375,
425 subchapter 2‑A.